Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 8
CONTRACEPTIVES AND PROPHYLACTICS

Sec.

§ 39-801. Registration required to sell and distribute prophylactics and contraceptives

Fees. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 39-802. Manufacturer to be identified — Compliance with standards

Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 39-803. Revocation or suspension of licenses — Arrest of violators

Seizure and confiscation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 39-804. Penalty for violations. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 39-805 — 39-807. Retail licenses and sales — Compliance with standards, rules and regulations — Display and advertising unlawful. [Repealed.]

§ 39-808. Penalty for violations. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-809, 39-810. Suppositories and other articles — Revocation or suspension of licenses — Arrest — Seizure and confiscation. [Repealed.]